Hawaii statutes.
[§323F-12] Public-private
partnership. (a) There is established within the corporation for
administrative purposes only a public-private partnership in a county that
encompasses at least three islands inhabited by permanent residents, to
research, develop, and implement a model of health care delivery that addresses
the coordination of care across the spectrum of care from acute, to skilled
nursing facility, to home, in a manner that is seamless, efficient,
appropriate, and cost-effective.

(b) The public-private partnership shall:

(1) Work to resolve the challenges in the post-acute
care environment;

(2) Expand inpatient capacity;

(3) Improve access to and quality of health care; and

(4) Enhance the operational and financial viability
of public and private health care providers at all levels of care.

(c) The public-private partnership shall be
mutually beneficial to stakeholders and consumers and shall be based upon the
following:

(1) Short-term goals:

(A) Provide a mechanism to move waitlisted
patients to an appropriate long-term care setting;

(B) Provide appropriate financial support to
allow for the movement of patients along the continuum of care, regardless of
the ability to pay;

(C) Maintain the financial viability of
skilled nursing facilities by providing adequate funding from all sources; and

(D) Maintain the financial viability of
full-service acute care facilities by reducing the number of waitlisted
patients.

(2) Long-term goals:

(A) Improve the continuity of care and efficiency
between providers;

(B) Enhance the quality of patient care;

(C) Create a patient-centered health care
infrastructure;

(D) Maximize capacity and increase operational
and financial viability among network organizations;

(E) Optimize existing resources to maximize
return;

(F) Facilitate the transition of care between
different levels of care;

(G) Reduce unnecessary transfers of patients
and attract medically appropriate transfers from neighboring islands;

(H) Create reimbursement mechanisms that
support integrated efforts;

(I) Reduce unnecessary health care use and
prevent unnecessary hospitalizations and readmissions; and

(J) Expand access to specialty services to
counties that encompass at least three islands inhabited by permanent residents.
[L 2012, c 279, §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next